Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 1.1 Termination of Service to Persons Who Are Disabled, Seriously Ill, or in Arrears of Payment

39-1.1-1.
Compliance with rules prior to termination.

No public utility that distributes electricity or supplies natural or manufactured gas, electric, or water service shall terminate service to any household in which all adult residents are sixty-five (65) years of age or older, or where any resident is disabled or seriously ill, for failure to pay an outstanding indebtedness for service, without first complying with all rules and regulations for such terminations issued by the commission.

A natural gas distribution company or an electric distribution company as defined in §

39-1-2(a)(12)

, but not including the Block Island Power Company or the Pascoag Utility District, shall not shut off service to a household eligible for LIHEAP if the customer’s outstanding bill is three hundred dollars ($300) or less and not more than two (2) months in arrears. Service may not be terminated unless two (2) notices of termination have been sent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 87; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 87; P.L. 2011, ch. 382, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 404, § 5.

39-1.1-2.
Determination of persons subject to nontermination.

The commission shall promulgate appropriate rules and regulations to determine which persons who are elderly, disabled, or seriously ill are subject to the nontermination provisions of §

39-1.1-1

, and in what manner relief will be made available to the subject persons.

Rules and regulations maintained to determine which persons are seriously ill shall include the provision that said determination shall be through certification to the public utility or to the division of public utilities and carriers by a licensed physician.

A licensed physician’s certification of serious illness shall be sufficient if initially made by telephone. In such event, the public utility or the division, whichever received initial certification, shall inform the certifying physician that he or she must forward to the public utility within seven (7) days a written certification indicating the name and address of the seriously ill person, the nature of the illness, and its likely duration. The public utility shall acknowledge receipt of such written certification and shall notify the customer in writing of the date upon which service will be terminated, unless the customer: (i) Has arranged for payment of an outstanding amount with the public utility, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission; (ii) Requests a hearing, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission; or (iii) Enrolls in a residential payment plan or other payment arrangement. The termination date shall be not less than three (3) weeks from receipt by the public utility of the written certification. If the duration of the illness exceeds three (3) weeks from the certification to the public utility, the customer may request a review pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission, to determine whether the initial exemption shall continue, for how long, and under what circumstances.

A public utility must honor a licensed physician’s certification of serious illness, but may seek division review of the validity of the certification, pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. If a licensed physician’s certification does not comply with the requirements promulgated by the commission and is rejected by a public utility, the public utility shall inform the customer immediately, in writing, of the reasons for rejection of the certification and the customer’s right to have the division review the utility’s rejection of the certification.

Nontermination for any reason does not, in any way, relieve the customer of liability incurred for utility services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 87; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 87; P.L. 2011, ch. 382, § 5; P.L. 2011, ch. 404, § 5.

39-1.1-2.1.
Termination of service in residence where child domiciled.

No gas or electric company shall terminate gas or electric service in any residence in which there is domiciled a person under the age of two (2) years and the customer’s service has not been previously shut off for nonpayment before the birth of the child; provided, that the customer cannot afford to pay any overdue bill because of financial hardship. The commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations consistent with this section as it deems reasonable and necessary to implement the provisions of this section. The rules shall, as a minimum, require certification of the infancy by birth certificate or other verifiable certification and that the certification of infancy shall remain in effect without renewal until the child reaches the age of two (2) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 297, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 445, § 1.

39-1.1-3.
Attempt to collect debt.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary to ensure that termination of utility service for outstanding indebtedness shall be authorized only after the utility has complied with reasonable methods of debt collection as defined by the division.

In promulgating the rules and regulations, the commission shall confer with the retail electric licensing commission and shall give reasonable consideration to any and all recommendations of the retail electric licensing commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 357, § 2.

39-1.1-4.
Effect on existing rules.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to modify any existing or proposed rules and regulations dealing with utility termination during winter months as defined by the commission. Nothing in this chapter is intended to modify any existing or proposed rules and regulations dealing with termination of telephone service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 5, § 1.

39-1.1-5.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, its invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 410, art. 8, § 1.